Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Rule-Making

§ 9-3-61.
General rule-making power vested in Supreme Court.

As a part of the judicial power granted in Article 6, Section 144, of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, the Supreme Court has the power to prescribe from time to time by general rules the forms of process, writs, pleadings, motions, rules of evidence and the practice and procedure for trials and appeals in the Court of Appeals and in the circuit, chancery and county courts of this state and for appeals to the Supreme Court from interlocutory or final orders of trial courts and administrative boards and agencies, and certiorari from the Court of Appeals.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 15; Laws, 1982, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 22; Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 9-3-63.
Limitation on rules.

Rules prescribed by the Supreme Court shall preserve the right of trial by jury as at common law and as declared by Article 3, Section 31 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and as declared by Amendment VII to the Constitution of the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 16; Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 9-3-65.
Advisory committee on Rules of Civil Practice and Procedure; membership; terms.

There shall be an advisory committee on rules which shall consist of (a) two (2) members selected by the judges of the Court of Appeals; (b) two (2) members selected by the Conference of Circuit Court Judges; (c) two (2) members selected by the Conference of Chancery Court Judges; (d) two (2) members selected by the Conference of County Court Judges; (e) two (2) members selected by the Mississippi Bar; (f) two (2) members selected by the Magnolia Bar Association; (g) two (2) members selected by the Mississippi Trial Lawyers Association; (h) two (2) members selected by the Mississippi Defense Lawyers Association; (i) two (2) members selected by the Mississippi Prosecutors Association; (j) two (2) members selected by the Mississippi Public Defenders Association; (k) the Dean of the University of Mississippi School of Law, or his designee; and (l) the Dean of the Mississippi College School of Law, or his designee.

All members of the advisory committee shall serve for terms of three (3) years provided that the committee at its discretion may divide its membership so that approximately one-third (1/3) of its members’ terms will expire each year and may modify the terms of such of its members as may be necessary to accomplish this end. Such selections and appointments shall be made by the respective appointing authorities. Vacancies on the advisory committee shall be filled by the respective selecting and appointing authorities. Members of the committee shall be eligible for reappointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 17; Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 9-3-67.
Advisory committee on Rules of Civil Practice and Procedure; chairman; research counsel; expenses.

The Advisory Committee on Rules shall select a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its members and shall provide for its method of operation. The committee shall have the authority to employ and compensate a competent person or persons to serve as research counsel for the advisory committee who shall serve at the pleasure of the committee either in a full-time or part-time capacity. The committee shall have the authority to employ reporters to direct such projects as it may undertake and to compensate such reporters as may be appropriate. In addition, the committee shall have the authority to employ and compensate such assistants to and staff for the research counsel and the reporters, and to employ and compensate such other persons as the committee may from time to time deem necessary or advisable to discharge the duties with which the committee is herein charged. Reasonable actual expenses of food, lodging and transportation incurred by members of the committee in the performance of their duties shall be reimbursed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 18; Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 9-3-69.
Advisory committee on Rules of Civil Practice and Procedure; duties.

The advisory committee shall make a comprehensive and continuing study of practice and procedure in the trial and appellate courts of this state; shall draft such rules pertaining thereunto as it concludes will simplify, improve and expedite the administration of justice; shall publicize the terms and provisions of the proposed rules and shall receive and consider suggestions from the bench, the bar and the public for their improvement; and shall recommend and submit a final draft of any proposed rules to the supreme court, which may amend, revise, delete or add to the recommended rules as it concludes will best serve the administration of justice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 19; Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 9-3-70.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1998, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1998).

§9-3-70. [Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1996]

§§ 9-3-71 and 9-3-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1996, ch. 384, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§9-3-71. [Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 20; Laws, 1982, ch. 321, § 2]

§9-3-73. [Laws, 1975, ch. 501, § 21]